Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-27,156
Nebraska Economic Forecasting Advisory Board; created.

To assist the Governor in developing estimates of revenue pursuant to section 81-125 and the Legislature in setting the rates of the income tax and sales tax pursuant to section 77-2715.01, there is hereby created the Nebraska Economic Forecasting Advisory Board.

Laws 1984, LB 892, § 3.